Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 137.0246, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Governor appointments. new text end new text begin If the joint legislative committee recommends a candidate to the joint convention for a vacancy on the board of regents and the legislature does not elect a person to fill the vacancy, the governor, in making an appointment to fill the vacancy, may only appoint a candidate recommended by the joint legislative committee. new text end